North Carolina, session 2025, HB1106.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to Iredell County
Partnership for Young Children, Inc., the sum of two hundred sixty thousand five hundred
thirty-eight dollars ($260,538) in recurring funds beginning in the 2026-2027 fiscal year for the
NC Prekindergarten (NC Pre-K) program in Iredell County. These funds will provide Iredell
County with the same funding level per child as Beaufort County.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
*H1106-v-1*